Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1820
Plea of guilty; record; accused; custody.

If the accused pleads guilty the plea shall be recorded on the indictment, and the accused may be placed in the custody of the sheriff until sentence.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 452, p. 823;

R.S.1913, § 9096;

C.S.1922, § 10121;

C.S.1929, § 29-1819;

R.S.1943, § 29-1820;

Laws 1963, c. 162, § 1, p. 575.

Requirement of entry of plea on back of indictment or information is directory and not mandatory. Jurgenson v. State, 166 Neb. 111, 88 N.W.2d 129 (1958).

Plea of guilty is equivalent to finding of guilty and will sustain such an order. Leiby v. State, 79 Neb. 485, 113 N.W. 125 (1907).

Plea of guilty, entered by defendant, is evidence against him in subsequent action to which he is party involving same subject matter. Wisnieski v. Vanek, 5 Neb. Unof. 512, 99 N.W. 258 (1904).